Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-637
Cancer and smoking disease research; terms, defined.

As used in sections 81-637 to 81-640, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Cancer means all malignant neoplasm regardless of the tissue of origin, including malignant lymphoma and leukemia;

(2) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services; and

(3) Smoking disease means diseases whose causes are linked to smoking including, but not limited to, cardiovascular, pulmonary, and gastrointestinal diseases.

Laws 1981, LB 506, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 846;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 735.